src/fst/affixes/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON PRON-HUM-COLL
+Coll:нан PRON-HUM-COLL-PERS ;
+ZeroColl: PRON-HUM-COLL-PERS ;
!
+ZeroColl+Acc+PxPl2:ныдтӧ INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
+Coll+Acc+PxPl2:наннытӧ INTERR-REL-INDEF ;

LEXICON PRON-HUM-COLL-PERS
+PxPl1:ным PRON-HUM-COLL-CASES ;
+PxPl2:ныд PRON-HUM-COLL-CASES ;
+PxPl3:ныс PRON-HUM-COLL-CASES ;
!
+Acc+PxPl1:нымӧс INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
+Acc+PxPl2:нытӧ INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
+Acc+PxPl3:ныссӧ INTERR-REL-INDEF ;

LEXICON PRON-HUM-COLL-CASES
+Nom: INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
 PRON-HUM-OBL ;

LEXICON PRON-NONHUM
+Nom: INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
+Gen:лӧн INTERR-REL-INDEF ; !
+Abl:лісь INTERR-REL-INDEF ; !
+Dat:лӧ INTERR-REL-INDEF ; !
+Acc+PxSg3:сӧ INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
+Ins:ӧн INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
+Com:кӧт INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
+Car:тӧг INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
+Cmpr:ся INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
+Cns:ла INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
+Ine:ын INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
+Ela:%{иі%}сь INTERR-REL-INDEF ; 
+Ill:ӧ INTERR-REL-INDEF ; !
+Apr:лань INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
+Egr:сянь INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
+Prl:ӧд INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
!+Tra:ті INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
+TerI:ӧдз INTERR-REL-INDEF ;

! Removing 2012-02-08 The comparative can be taken care of once
! LEXICON INTERR-REL-INDEF_COMPARISON
! +Der/джык+Comp:%>джык INTERR-REL ;
!               INTERR-REL ;

LEXICON Ill4INTERR-REL-INDEF
+Ill: INTERR-REL-INDEF ;

LEXICON EgrIll4INTERR-REL-INDEF
+Egr+Ill: INTERR-REL-INDEF ;

LEXICON Egr4INTERR-REL-INDEF
+Egr: INTERR-REL-INDEF ;

LEXICON Tra4INTERR-REL-INDEF
+Pron+Tra: INTERR-REL-INDEF ;

LEXICON TraEgr4INTERR-REL-INDEF
+Tra+Egr: INTERR-REL-INDEF ;

LEXICON Ter4INTERR-REL-INDEF
+TerI: INTERR-REL-INDEF ;

LEXICON INTERR-REL-INDEF ! 3 types of pronouns are congregated here
 PRON-INDEFTAG ; ! This leads to a variety of indefinite pronouns
 INTERR-REL ; ! This leads to a split between relative and interrogative pronouns

LEXICON INTERR-REL
+Interr: COMPARATIVE ;
+Rel: K ;

LEXICON PRON-INDEFTAG
+Der/кӧ+Indef:%>кӧ K ;
+Der/сюрӧ+Indef:%>сюрӧ K ;


! Indefinite pronouns
 
LEXICON PRONINDEFTAG
+Pron+Indef: WordEnd ;

LEXICON PRONINDEFTAG-KO
+Pron: PRONINDEF-PERS-KO-CX ;

LEXICON PRONINDEF-PERS-KO-CX
+Nom: PRONINDEF-PERS-KO-END ;
+Acc:%>ӧс PRONINDEF-PERS-KO-END ;
+Gen:%>лӧн PRONINDEF-PERS-KO-END ;
+Abl:%>лісь PRONINDEF-PERS-KO-END ;
+Dat:%>лӧ PRONINDEF-PERS-KO-END ;
+Ins:%>ӧн PRONINDEF-PERS-KO-END ;
+Ela:%>ісь PRONINDEF-PERS-KO-END ; !2011-10-19 It might be that this only has to do with мый _what_ and мыйыськӧ _for some reason_
+Com:%>кӧт PRONINDEF-PERS-KO-END ;
+Egr:%>сянь PRONINDEF-PERS-KO-END ;

LEXICON PRONINDEF-PERS-KO-END
+Der/кӧ+Indef:%>кӧ K ;
+Der/сюрӧ+Indef:%>сюрӧ K ; !Basically both endings can be used for deriving 
 !indefinite pronouns from the interrogative/relative pronouns.


LEXICON IS_PRON-INDEF-KO
+Pron+Der/кӧ+Indef: K ;

LEXICON IS_PRON-INDEF-SJURO
+Pron+Der/сюрӧ+Indef: K ;

LEXICON IS_PRON-INTERR
+Pron+Interr: K ;

!LEXICON PRONINDEF-PERS-END
!+Der/сюрӧ:%>сюрӧ WordEnd ;

!LEXICON PRONINDEF-PERS-KO
!+Nom: PRONINDEF-PERS-KO-END ;
!+Acc:%>ӧс PRONINDEF-PERS-KO-END ;
!+Gen:%>лӧн PRONINDEF-PERS-KO-END ;
!+Dat:%>лӧ PRONINDEF-PERS-KO-END ;
!+Acc:%>ӧс PRONINDEF-PERS-KO-END ;


!LEXICON PRON-SPAT
!+Pron+Spat: COMPARATIVE ;

LEXICON PRON-RECIPR
+Pron+Recipr: PRON-RECIPR-CASE ;

LEXICON PRON-RECIPR-CASE
+Cmpl: WordEnd ;
+PxSg2+Cmpl:ыд K ;
+PxSg2+Cmpl:ыс K ;
+PxPl1+Cmpl:ным K ;
+PxPl2+Cmpl:ныд K ;
+PxPl3+Cmpl:ныс K ;
GEN_THEN-K ;
+PxSg3+Abl:ыслісь K ;
+PxPl3+Abl:ныслісь K ;
DAT_THEN-K ;
+PxSg3+Dat:ыслӧ K ;
+PxPl3+Dat:ныслӧ K ;
+Acc+PxSg1:ӧс K ;
+Acc+PxPl1:нымӧс K ;
+Acc+PxPl2:нытӧ K ;
+Acc+PxPl3:ныссӧ K ;
+Acc+PxSg3:сӧ K ;
+PxSg3+Com:ыскӧт K ;
+PxPl2+Com:ныдкӧт K ;
+PxPl3+Com:ныскӧт K ;
+Car+PxSg3:тӧгыс K ;
ELA_THEN-K ;
+Ela+PxSg3:сьыс K ;
+Ela+PxPl3:сьыныс K ;
+PxSg3+Ill:ас K ; ! Here is a good problem: Should there be a special tag
                ! for the illative-inessive forms
+PxPl3+Ill:нысӧ K ;


LEXICON PRON-REL
+Pron+Rel: WordEnd ;

LEXICON PRON-REFL-IN_LADOR
+Pron+Refl+Der/ладор: Noun1 ; !2011-11-22

LEXICON EndRefl
+Pron+Refl+Cmpl: WordEnd ; !ас is an absolute-form modifer
 PRON-REFL-OBL-CASES ;

LEXICON PRON-REFL-OBL-CASES
+Ela+PxSg1:сим K ;
+Ela+PxSg2:сит K ;
+Ela+PxSg3:сис K ;
+Ela+PxPl1:синым K ;
+Ela+PxPl1+Abl:синымлісь K ;
+Ela+PxPl1+Ela:синымысь K ;
+Ela+PxPl2:синыт K ;
+Ela+PxPl3:синыс K ;
+Dat+PxSg1:лым K ;
+Dat+PxSg2:лыт K ;
+Dat+PxSg3:лыс K ;
+Dat+PxPl1:лыным K ;
+Dat+PxPl2:лыныт K ;
+Dat+PxPl2+Dat:лынытлӧ K ;
+Dat+PxPl3:лыныс K ;
+Dat+PxPl3+Dat:лыныслӧ K ;
+PxPl3+Dat:ныслӧ K ;
+Ins+PxSg1:ӧн K ; !There is no indication of person. = Sg1, Pl3
+Ins+PxPl3:ӧн K ; !There is no indication of person. = Sg1, Pl3
+Ins+PxSg1+Ins:намӧн K ;
+Ins+PxSg2:над K ;
+Ins+PxSg3:нас K ;
+Ins+PxPl1:наным K ;
+Ins+PxPl2:наныд K ;
+Ins+PxPl3:наныс K ;
+Com+PxSg1:кӧт K ; !There is no indication of person. = Sg1
+Com+PxSg2:кӧтыд K ; !
+Com+PxSg3:кӧтыс K ; !
+Com+PxPl1:кӧтным K ; !
+Com+PxPl2:кӧтныд K ; !
+Com+PxPl2:ныдкӧт K ; !
+Com+PxPl3:кӧтныс K ; !
+Com+PxPl3:ныскӧт K ; !
+Car+PxSg1:тӧг K ; !There is no indication of person. = Sg1
+Car+PxSg2:тӧгыд K ; !
+Car+PxSg3:тӧгыс K ; !
+Car+PxPl1:тӧгным K ; !
+Car+PxPl2:тӧгныд K ; !
+Car+PxPl2:ныдтӧг K ; !
+Car+PxPl3:тӧгныс K ; !
+Car+PxPl3:ныстӧг K ; !
+Cons+PxSg1:ла K ; !There is no indication of person. = Sg1
+Cons+PxSg2:лаыд K ;
+Cons+PxSg2:ыдла K ;
+Cons+PxSg3:ысла K ;
+Cons+PxPl2:ныдла K ;
+Cons+PxPl3:нысла K ;
+Ine+PxSg2:ад K ;
+Ine+PxSg3:ас K ;
+Ine+PxPl1:аным K ;
+Ine+PxPl2:аныд K ;
+Ine+PxPl3:аныс K ;
+Ill+PxSg1:ӧ K ; !There is no indication of person. = Sg1
+Ill+PxSg1:ам K ; !Ӧнія коми кыв gives this for illative only
+Ill+PxSg2:ад K ; !
+Ill+PxSg3:ас K ; !
+Ill+PxPl1:аным K ; !
+Ill+PxPl2:аныд K ; !
+Ill+PxPl3:аныс K ; !
+Apr+PxSg1:лань K ; !There is no indication of person. = Sg1
+Apr+PxSg2:ланьыд K ;
+Apr+PxSg3:ланьыс K ;
+Apr+PxPl1:ланьным K ;
+Apr+PxPl2:ланьныд K ;
+Apr+PxPl3:ланьныс K ;
+Sg1+Egr:сянь K ; !There is no indication of person. = Sg1
+Egr+PxSg2:сяньыд K ;
+Egr+PxSg3:сяньыс K ;
+Egr+PxPl1:сяньным K ;
+Egr+PxPl2:сяньныд K ;
+Egr+PxPl3:сяньныс K ;
!+Sg1+Tra:ті K ; !There is no indication of person. = Sg1
!+Tra+PxSg2:тіыд K ;
!+Tra+PxSg3:тіыс K ;
! Pl1 and Pl2 are not attested in Ӧнія коми кыв
!+Tra+PxPl3:тіныс K ;
+Sg1+TerI:ӧдз K ; !There is no indication of person. = Sg1
+TerI+PxSg2:ӧдзыд K ;
+TerI+PxSg3:ӧдзыс K ;
+PxPl1+TerI:нымӧдз K ;
+PxPl2+TerI:ныдӧдз K ;
+PxPl3+TerI:нысӧдз K ;
!Extras 2011-10-07


LEXICON PRON-REFL-SG1-NOM
+Pron+Refl+Sg1+Nom: WordEnd ;
+Pron+Refl+Sg1+Acc:ӧс WordEnd ;
+Pron+Refl+Sg1: INS_THEN-WORD-END ;
+Pron+Refl+Sg1: COM_THEN-WORD-END ;
+Pron+Refl+Sg1: CAR_THEN-WORD-END ;
+Pron+Refl+Sg1: INE_THEN-WORD-END ;
+Pron+Refl+Sg1: ELA_THEN-WORD-END ;
+Pron+Refl+Sg1: ILL_THEN-WORD-END ;


LEXICON PRON-REFL-SG1-GEN
+Pron+Refl+Sg1+Gen: WordEnd ;
+Pron+Refl+Sg1: COM_THEN-WORD-END ;
+Pron+Refl+Sg1: EGR_THEN-WORD-END ;

LEXICON PRON-REFL-SG2-NOM
+Pron+Refl+Sg2+Nom: WordEnd ;
+Pron+Refl+Sg2: CAR_THEN-WORD-END ;
+Pron+Refl+Sg2: ELA_THEN-WORD-END ;

LEXICON PRON-REFL-SG2-GEN
+Pron+Refl+Sg2+Gen: WordEnd ;
+Pron+Refl+Sg2+Erg:сянь WordEnd ;

LEXICON PRON-REFL-SG2-ACC
+Pron+Refl+Sg2+Acc: WordEnd ;

LEXICON PRON-REFL-SG3-NOM
+Pron+Refl+Sg3+Nom: WordEnd ;
+Pron+Refl+Sg3: INS_THEN-WORD-END ;
+Pron+Refl+Sg3: COM_THEN-WORD-END ;
+Pron+Refl+Sg3: CAR_THEN-WORD-END ;
+Pron+Refl+Sg3: ELA_THEN-WORD-END ;

LEXICON PRON-REFL-SG3-GEN
+Pron+Refl+Sg3+Gen: WordEnd ;
+Pron+Refl+Sg3: GEN_THEN-WORD-END ;
+Pron+Refl+Sg3: INE_THEN-WORD-END ;

LEXICON PRON-REFL-SG3-ACC
+Pron+Refl+Sg3+Acc: WordEnd ;

LEXICON PRON-REFL-PL1-NOM
+Pron+Refl+Pl1+Nom: WordEnd ;
+Pron+Refl+Pl1+Acc:ӧс WordEnd ;
+Pron+Refl+Pl1: COM_THEN-WORD-END ;
+Pron+Refl+Pl1: CAR_THEN-WORD-END ;
+Pron+Refl+Pl1: ELA_THEN-WORD-END ;
+Pron+Refl+Pl1: TERI_THEN-WORD-END ;

LEXICON PRON-REFL-PL1-GEN
+Pron+Refl+Pl1+Gen: WordEnd ;
+Pron+Refl+Pl1: ABL_THEN-WORD-END ;
+Pron+Refl+Pl1+Der/ладор:%>ладор Noun1 ;

LEXICON PRON-REFL-PL2-NOM
+Pron+Refl+Pl2+Nom: WordEnd ;
+Pron+Refl+Pl2+Acc:тӧ WordEnd ;
+Pron+Refl+Pl2: CNS_THEN-WORD-END ;
+Pron+Refl+Pl2: CAR_THEN-WORD-END ;
+Pron+Refl+Pl2: ELA_THEN-WORD-END ;
